Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Judicial Dissolution

§ 17-19-1430.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The district court may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established that:

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud;

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The corporation is a public benefit corporation and the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The corporation is a public benefit corporation and is no longer able to carry out its purposes.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation, in a proceeding by fifty (50) members or members holding five percent (5%) of the voting power, whichever is less, or by a director or any person specified in the articles, if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, and the members, if any, are unable to break the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent;

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two (2) consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have, or would otherwise have, expired;

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The corporation is a public benefit or religious corporation and is no longer able to carry out its purposes.

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied and the corporation is insolvent; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent.

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

Prior to dissolving a corporation, the court shall consider whether:

There are reasonable alternatives to dissolution;

Dissolution is in the public interest, if the corporation is a public benefit corporation; and

Dissolution is the best way of protecting the interests of members, if the corporation is a mutual benefit corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Deadlock.

Foundation was entitled to summary judgment on a director’s judicial dissolution claim based on deadlock, based on an alleged conflict of interest, because (1) the director had to first bring a derivative action to void the election of one of three directors, (2) the director did not comply with this requirement, and (3) there were thus three directors, so there could be no deadlock. Sullivan v. Pike & Susan Sullivan Found., 2018 WY 19, 412 P.3d 306,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 17-19-1431.
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue for a proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a corporation lies in Laramie county district court. Venue for a proceeding brought by any other party named in W.S.

17-19-1430

lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or was last located.

It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the activities of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

A person other than the attorney general who brings an involuntary dissolution proceeding for a public benefit or religious corporation shall forthwith give written notice of the proceeding to the secretary of state who shall then notify the attorney general. The attorney general may intervene.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1432.
Receivership or custodianship.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation may appoint one (1) or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one (1) or more custodians to manage, the affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual, or a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation, authorized to transact business in this state, as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver:

May dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; provided, however, that the receiver’s power to dispose of the assets of the corporation is subject to any trust and other restrictions that would be applicable to the corporation; and

May sue and defend in the receiver’s or custodian’s name as receiver or custodian of the corporation in all Wyoming district courts.

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its members, and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and the receiver or custodian’s counsel from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1433.
Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one (1) or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in W.S.

17-19-1430

exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state, who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s affairs in accordance with W.S.

17-19-1406

and the notification of its claimants in accordance with W.S.

17-19-1407

and

17-19-1408

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.